Washington statutes.
RCW 15.35.100

Director's authority—Subpoena power—Rules.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter, the director is hereby vested with the authority:

(1) To investigate all matters pertaining to the production, processing, storage, transportation, and distribution of milk and milk products in the state, and shall have the authority to:

(a) Establish classifications of processed milk and milk products, and a minimum price or a formula to determine a minimum price to be paid by milk dealers for milk used to produce each such class of products;

(b) Require that payment be made by dealers to producers of fluid milk or their cooperative associations and prescribe the method and time of such payments by dealers to producers or their cooperative associations in accordance with a marketing plan for milk;

(c) Determine what constitutes a natural milk market area;

(d) Establish quota systems within marketing plans, and to determine by using uniform rules, what portion of the milk produced by each producer shall be assigned to each quota classification;

(e) Provide for the pooling of minimum class values from the sales of each class of milk to milk dealers, and the equalization of returns to producers;

(f) Provide and establish market pools for a designated market area with such rules as the director may adopt;

(g) Employ an executive officer, who shall be known as the milk pooling administrator;

(h) Employ such persons or contract with such entities as may be necessary and incur all expenses necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(i) Determine by rule, what portion of any increase in the available quotas shall be assigned to new producers or existing producers.

(2) To issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and/or the production of books, documents, and records anywhere in the state in any hearing affecting the authority of privileges granted by a license issued under the provisions of this chapter. Witnesses shall be entitled to fees for attendance and travel as provided for in chapter 2.40 RCW.

(3) To make, adopt, and enforce all rules necessary to carry out the purposes and policies of this chapter subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW concerning the adoption of rules. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to abrogate or affect the status, force, or operation of any provision of the public health laws enacted by the state or any municipal corporation or the public service laws of this state.

[ 1993 c 345 s 6; 1991 c 239 s 6; 1971 ex.s. c 230 s 10.]